Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2123
Board of directors; power to adopt rules and regulations; fix prices.

The board of directors of a metropolitan utilities district is hereby empowered to (1) adopt all necessary rules and regulations for the operation and conducting of the business and affairs of its natural gas and water utilities for the purpose of supplying gas for heat and power purposes for public and private use and for the purpose of supplying water for domestic, mechanical, public, and fire purposes and (2) fix the prices to be charged therefor.

Laws 1919, c. 187, § 2, p. 421;

C.S.1922, § 3772;

C.S.1929, § 14-1028;

Laws 1939, c. 9, § 1, p. 74;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1028;

Laws 1943, c. 36, § 21, p. 176;

R.S.1943, § 14-1038;

Laws 1945, c. 19, § 2, p. 124;

Laws 1967, c. 46, § 2, p. 177;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1038;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 23.